Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
329E]

OVERDOSE
PREVENTION AND EMERGENCY RESPONSE ACT

Section

329E-1 Definitions

329E-2 Immunity

329E-3 Opioid antagonist administration;
emergency personnel

and first responders

329E-4 Medicaid coverage

329E-5 Harm reduction organization; opioid
antagonist;

exemption

329E-6 Unintentional opioid-related drug
overdose; reporting

329E-7 Opioid-related drug overdose recognition,
prevention,

and response

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next